Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Human  Services shall procure, distribute and main-
tain an inventory of appropriate carriers for child welfare case workers to use when trans-
porting the personal effects of a foster  child, including when the foster child is entering into
or transitioning or exiting from foster care.
(2) The department may  not use trash bags to transport a foster child’s personal effects.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1, chapter 210, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  [(1) The Department of Human Services shall procure, distribute and maintain an inventory
of appropriate luggage carriers for child welfare case workers to  use when transporting the personal
effects of a foster child, including when the foster child is entering into or transitioning  or exiting from
foster care.]
[(2)] The  Department of Human Services shall submit a report  regarding the department’s
transportation of the personal effects of foster children  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to human  services no later than September 15 of each year. The report must
describe :
(1) The department’s supply of appropriate carriers for the transportation  of a foster
child’s personal effects;
(2) The department’s inventory management practices  for supplies of appropriate carri-
ers for the transportation of a foster child’s personal effects; and
(3) If in the  preceding reporting period trash bags were used to transport a foster child’s
personal effects, the number of instances  in the preceding reporting period that trash bags were
used to transport a foster child’s personal effects[ ,] and the reasons for using  the trash bags[ , the
department’s supply of appropriate luggage carriers and its supply inventory management practices ].
Enrolled Senate Bill 1016 (SB 1016-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1016 (SB 1016-A) Page 2